Maine, session 132, LD1444.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §6111, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Application. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, for
any cause of action arising prior to January 11, 2024 for a claim in which a foreclosure
action was dismissed due to a defective notice of a mortgagor's right to cure pursuant to
this section, any subsequent cause of action asserting a claim for any sums due on the
obligation as of the date of the final judgment dismissing the prior action is barred. The
holding in the case of Finch v. U.S. Bank, N.A., 2024 Me. 2 may not be applied to any cause
of action arising prior to January 11, 2024.
Page 1 - 132LR0736(05)